Mississippi statutes. Title 13. Evidence, Process and Juries
Examination of Judgment Debtor by Judgment Creditor

§ 13-1-261.
Judgment creditor’s right to examination of judgment debtor.

To aid in the satisfaction of a judgment of more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), the judgment creditor may examine the judgment debtor, his books, papers or documents, upon any matter relating to his property as provided in Sections 13-1-261 through 13-1-271; except that no single judgment creditor may cause a judgment debtor to submit to examination under this section more than once in a period of six (6) months.

In addition to the method of examination prescribed in subsection (1), the judgment creditor may, in the alternative, utilize the discovery procedures set forth in the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure for the purpose of examining the judgment debtor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 381, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 407; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 91, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 13-1-263.
Venue for filing motion for examination and for conducting examination.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the written motion for the examination of a judgment debtor shall be filed, and the proceedings conducted, in the court which rendered the judgment.

If the judgment debtor is an individual who is domiciled in the state but not in the county where the judgment was rendered, or who has changed his domicile to another county after the institution of the suit, the written motion for his examination shall be filed, and the examination conducted, in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county of his then domicile. If the judgment debtor is a nonresident, the petition for his examination shall be filed, and the examination conducted, in a court of competent jurisdiction in any county where he may be found. In any case mentioned in this paragraph, a certified copy of the judgment shall be attached to the written motion for examination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 381, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1976).

§ 13-1-265.
Order to appear for examination; effect of satisfaction of judgment.

On ex parte written motion of the judgment creditor, personally or through his attorney, the court shall order the judgment debtor to appear in court for examination at a time fixed by the court, not less than five (5) days from the date of service on him of the motion and order, and to produce any books, papers, and other documents relating to his property described in the motion; provided, however, that satisfaction of the judgment shall discharge the judgment debtor from his responsibility to appear for the examination as ordered by the court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 381, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1976).

§ 13-1-267.
Swearing of judgment debtor; use of testimony of judgment debtor in criminal proceeding.

The debtor shall be sworn to tell the truth in the same manner as a witness in a civil action.

No testimony given by a debtor shall be used in any criminal proceeding against him, except for perjury committed at such examination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 381, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1976).

§ 13-1-269.
Court costs.

Court costs in connection with the examination shall be taxed against the judgment debtor, except that if the court determines that the creditor invoked the remedy needlessly, the court may tax the costs against the creditor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 381, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1976).

§ 13-1-271.
Contempt.

If the motion and order have been served personally on the judgment debtor, and he refuses to appear for the examination or to produce his books, papers, or other documents when ordered to do so, or if he refuses to answer any question held pertinent by the court, he may be punished for contempt.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 381, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1976).